Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska87-710
Obligations; applicability to successors.

The obligations of any supplier pursuant to the Equipment Business Regulation Act shall apply to any successor in interest of a supplier, including any purchaser of assets or stock, any surviving corporation resulting from merger, liquidation, or reorganization, any assignee, any receiver, or any trustee of the original supplier.

Laws 1991, LB 123, § 10.